Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-7604
Health benefit plan; offer to self-employed individual or employer; restrictions.

No multiple employer welfare arrangement may offer to a self-employed individual or to an employer that is domiciled in this state or that has its principal headquarters or principal administrative offices in this state a health benefit plan unless the health benefit plan is a fully insured health benefit plan or unless the multiple employer welfare arrangement obtains and maintains a certificate of registration pursuant to the Multiple Employer Welfare Arrangement Act.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB1014, § 3.
November 14, 2020